Utah statutes.
59-2-313.   Assessor to furnish information to commission.

The county assessor shall furnish to the commission, promptly upon demand, any information it may require as to the several kinds of personal and real property, and the taxable value of those properties, which are located in the county.



Amended by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

